New York, session 2025-2026, S10195.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 7 of chapter 322 of the laws of 2014, relating to 2 joint bidding on contracts for public works projects, as amended by 3 chapter 627 of the laws of 2025, is amended to read as follows: 4 § 7. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 5 deemed repealed December 31, [2026] 2027. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15158-02-6